Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-115
Annexed cities and villages; taxes, fines, fees, claims; inure to city of the primary class.

All taxes, assessments, fines, licenses, fees, claims, and demands of every kind assessed or levied against persons or property within any such city of the second class or village thus consolidated with or annexed by any such city of the primary class, shall be paid to and collected by such city of the primary class.

Laws 1921, c. 202, § 5, p. 732;

C.S.1922, § 3794;

C.S.1929, § 15-115;

R.S.1943, § 15-115;

Laws 1965, c. 43, § 3, p. 239.